Washington statutes.
RCW 43.220.250

Reimbursement of nonprofit corporations for certain services.

A nonprofit corporation which contracts with the department to provide a specific service, appropriate for the administration of this chapter which the department cannot otherwise provide, may be reimbursed at the discretion of the department for the reasonable costs the department would absorb for providing those services.

[ 2011 c 20 s 10; 1985 c 230 s 5.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2011 c 20: See note following RCW 43.220.020.